Utah statutes.
31A-40-201.   Enforceable rights and obligations.

(1)  In a coemployment relationship under a professional employer agreement:

(a)  a professional employer organization:

(i)  may only enforce a right of an employer that is specifically allocated to the professional employer organization under the professional employer agreement or this chapter; and

(ii)  is subject only to an obligation of an employer specifically allocated to the professional employer organization by the professional employer agreement or this chapter; and

(b)  a client:

(i)  may enforce a right of an employer:

(A)  allocated to the client in the professional employer agreement or this chapter; or

(B)  not specifically allocated to the professional employer organization under the professional employer agreement or this chapter; and

(ii)  is subject to an obligation of an employer:

(A)  allocated to the client by the professional employer agreement or this chapter; or

(B)  not specifically allocated to a professional employer organization by the professional employer agreement or this chapter.

(2)  A right or obligation of a professional employer organization as a coemployer of a covered employee is limited to a right or obligation arising pursuant to the professional employer agreement and this chapter during the term of coemployment of the covered employee by the professional employer organization.

